Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1703, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 295, O.S.L. 2023 (69 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1703), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1703. A. There is hereby created a body corporate and


politic to be known as the “Oklahoma Turnpike Authority” and by that


name the Authority may sue and be sued, and plead and be impleaded.


The Authority is hereby constituted an instrumentality of the state,

Req. No. 2841 Page 1


and the exercise by the Authority of the powers conferred by this


act Section 1701 et seq. of this title in the construction,


operation, and maintenance of turnpike projects shall be deemed and


held to be an essential governmental function of the state with all


the attributes thereof. Provided, however, the Oklahoma Turnpike


Authority is authorized to carry and shall carry liability insurance


to the same extent and in the same manner as the Transportation


Commission, and in addition thereto it shall be subject to the


workers’ compensation laws of the state, the same as a private


construction project.


B. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority shall consist of the


Governor, who shall be a member an ex officio member, two (2)


members to be appointed by the Governor, two (2) members to be


appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives,


and two (2) members to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of


the Oklahoma State Senate. The appointive members shall be


residents of the state, and shall have been qualified electors


therein for a period of at least one (1) year next preceding their


appointment. One appointive member shall be appointed from each of


six districts of the state, such districts to include the area as


follows:


District 1. Oklahoma, Canadian, Cleveland, McClain and Garvin


Counties.



Req. No. 2841 Page 2


District 2. Washington, Nowata, Craig, Ottawa, Rogers, Mayes,


Delaware, Wagoner, Cherokee, Adair, Okmulgee, Osage, Muskogee,


Sequoyah, McIntosh and Haskell Counties.


District 3. Coal, Logan, Payne, Lincoln, Creek, Okfuskee,


Pottawatomie, Seminole, Hughes and Pontotoc Counties.


District 4. Kay, Pawnee, Garfield, Noble, Tulsa, Woods,


Woodward, Major, Alfalfa and Grant Counties.


District 5. Cimarron, Grady, Texas, Beaver, Harper, Ellis,


Roger Mills, Dewey, Custer, Caddo, Washita, Beckham, Harmon,


Stephens, Jefferson, Greer, Kiowa, Jackson, Tillman, Comanche,


Cotton, Kingfisher and Blaine Counties.


District 6. Carter, Love, Murray, Johnston, Marshall, Atoka,


Bryan, Pittsburg, Latimer, Le Flore, Pushmataha, Choctaw and


McCurtain Counties.


The Governor shall appoint the members from Districts 1 and 2.


The Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives shall appoint


the members from Districts 3 and 4. The President Pro Tempore of


the Oklahoma State Senate shall appoint the members from Districts 5


and 6. Appointive members serving on the Oklahoma Turnpike


Authority on the effective date of this act November 1, 2023, shall


continue to serve as members of the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority for


the remainder of the original terms for which they were appointed,


unless sooner removed by the appointing authority for their District


district. Thereafter, each appointive member shall be appointed in

Req. No. 2841 Page 3


the manner set forth by this section for a term of six (6) years,


except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall be


appointed to serve only for the unexpired term, and a member of the


Authority shall be eligible for reappointment. Each appointed


member of the Authority before entering upon the duties of office


shall take an oath as provided by Section 1 of Article XV of the


Oklahoma Constitution of the State of Oklahoma. Any appointive


member of the Authority may be removed at any time with cause by the


appointing authority.


C. The Authority shall elect one of the appointed members as


chairperson chair and another as vice-chairperson vice chair, and


shall also elect a Secretary secretary and Treasurer treasurer. A


majority of the members of the Authority shall constitute a quorum


and the vote of a majority of the members shall be necessary for any


action taken by the Authority. No vacancy in the membership of the


Authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the


rights and perform all the duties of the Authority.


D. Appointed members An appointed member of the Authority shall


be prohibited from voting on any issue in which the member has a


direct financial interest.


E. Before the issuance of any turnpike revenue bonds under the


provisions of this act Section 1701 et seq. of this title, each


appointed member of the Authority shall execute a surety bond in the


penal sum of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and the

Req. No. 2841 Page 4


secretary and treasurer shall execute a surety bond in the penal sum


of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), each such surety bond


to be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the


office, to be executed by a surety company authorized to transact


business in the State of Oklahoma this state as surety and to be


approved by the Governor and filed in the office Office of the


Secretary of State.


F. The members of the Authority shall not be entitled to


compensation for their services, but each member shall be reimbursed


for actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of the


duties of such member. All expenses incurred in carrying out the


provisions of this act Section 1701 et seq. of this title shall be


payable solely from funds provided under the authority of this act


Section 1701 et seq. of this title and no liability or obligation


shall be incurred by the Authority hereunder beyond the extent to


which monies shall have been provided under the authority of this


act.


G. Whenever the terms “Oklahoma Transportation Authority”,


“Transportation Authority”, or “Authority”, when used in reference


to the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority, appear in the Oklahoma Statutes,


such terms shall mean the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority.


H. The conduct of the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority shall be


subject to and not exercised contrary to the provisions of Section 2


of this act.

Req. No. 2841 Page 5


I. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority shall annually provide a


copy of its most recent annual report to the members of the Turnpike


Legislative Oversight Board, in addition to any information


requested pursuant to the provisions of Section 2 of this act.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1703.1 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created the Turnpike Legislative Oversight


Board for the purpose of overseeing the functions, activities,


policies, procedures, and expenditures performed by the Oklahoma


Turnpike Authority and any related issues the Board deems


appropriate. Members of the Board shall be appointed in January of


each year following a state general election for two-year terms, and


shall continue to serve until new members are appointed. The


President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint six members from


the Senate, to be from each of the six districts of the state as


provided for in subsection B of Section 1703 of Title 69 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives


shall appoint six members from the House of Representatives, to be


from each of the six districts of the state as provided for in


subsection B of Section 1703 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of


the House of Representatives shall each designate one of their


appointees to serve as co-chair of the Board. The Board shall meet

Req. No. 2841 Page 6


at least once annually. Additional meetings may be called as the


co-chairs deem necessary. Meetings of the Board shall be called by


the co-chairs. A majority of the appointed members shall constitute


a quorum for any meeting of the Board.


C. The Board may conduct hearings, studies, and any other


meetings necessary to fulfill the duties of the Board. The Board


may compel the production of witnesses, experts, data, and any non-


privileged information from the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority as


necessary for the performance of the Board’s oversight duties. The


Board shall produce an annual written report on the activities of


the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority including information regarding the


conduct and quality of the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority’s management,


administration, and transparency. Such report shall be approved by


a majority of the members and distributed electronically to the


Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of


the House of Representatives, the members of the Oklahoma Turnpike


Authority, and the Executive Director of the Oklahoma Turnpike


Authority.


D. The Board may, through a majority vote of all members


present in person, temporarily suspend any non-ex officio member of


the board of directors or executive staff of the Oklahoma Turnpike


Authority for thirty (30) days for the purpose of an investigation.


Causes for suspension include, but are not limited to:


1. Refusal to cooperate with the requests of the Board;

Req. No. 2841 Page 7


2. Mismanagement of Oklahoma Turnpike Authority funds;


3. Professional misconduct; or


4. Violation of any applicable administrative rule.


E. If the thirty (30) days have elapsed and no investigation


has been conducted, the suspended member of the board of directors


or executive staff shall be immediately reinstated.


F. After the thirty (30) days have elapsed and an investigation


has been conducted, the Board may vote to reinstate the suspended


member of the board of directors or executive staff, or, through a


two-thirds (2/3) vote of the Board, with all members present, send


the question of retaining the services of the suspended member to


the Senate and the House of Representatives. If two-thirds (2/3) of


both houses of the Legislature vote to remove the suspended member,


the member is removed from his or her position, regardless of the


appointing officer.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2841 MSBB 1/15/2026 9:09:27 AM







Req. No. 2841 Page 8